District of Columbia statutes.
1-624.06

Repealed

Abolishment of positions for Fiscal Year 1996.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2406
as added Jan. 26, 1996, D.C. Law 11-78, § 401(b), 42 DCR 6181
Mar. 5, 1996, D.C. Law 11-98, § 201(b), 43 DCR 5
Aug. 1, 1996, D.C. Law 11-152, § 501, 43 DCR 2978
Apr. 26, 1996, 110 Stat. 216, Pub. L. 104-134, § 149(b)
June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(x)(2), 45 DCR 2464
1981 Ed., § 1-625.6.

Applicability of § 101(x) of D.C. Law 12-124: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-624.01.

“Sec. 401. (a) Section 101(d), (k), (p), (s), and (x) of this act shall apply upon the enactment of legislation by the United States Congress that states the following:

“Notwithstanding any other law, section 101(d), (k), (p), (s), and (x) of the Omnibus Personnel Reform Amendment Act of 1998, effective June 10, 1998 (D.C. Law 12-124; 45 DCR 2464) are enacted into law.”

Pub. L. 105-277, Div. C, Title I, § 134, Oct. 21, 1998, 112 Stat. 2681-596, provided: “Sec. 134. Notwithstanding any other law, sections 101(d), (k), (p), (s) and (x) of the Omnibus Personnel Reform Amendment Act of 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, effective June 11, 1998, are enacted into law.”